Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1307.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of economic security; emergency shelters A. The sum of $5,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of economic security to distribute as grants to emergency shelters. B. Emergency shelters located in this state are eligible to receive grants from the monies appropriated in subsection A of this section if the emergency shelter does not require a prescheduled intake appointment and provides the following: 1. Low-barrier, emergency shelter for: (a) Single adults who are fifty-five years of age or older. (b) Families with children under eighteen years of age. 2. One hundred or more beds in a noncongregate setting. 3. Thirty or more individual units.